Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-32,168
Insurance laws; when applicable.

Except as otherwise provided in Chapter 44 or the Health Maintenance Organization Act, the insurance laws shall not be applicable to any health maintenance organization granted a certificate of authority under the act. This section shall not apply to an insurer licensed and regulated pursuant to the insurance laws except with respect to its activities authorized and regulated pursuant to the act.

Laws 1990, LB 1136, § 77.